Hawaii statutes.
[§521-55] Tenant's responsibility to inform
landlord. Any defective condition of the premises which comes to the
tenant's attention, which the tenant has reason to believe is unknown to the
landlord, and which the tenant has reason to believe is the duty of the
landlord or of another tenant to repair, shall be reported by the tenant to the
landlord as soon as practicable. [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next